src/fst/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! !!!Adverb inflection
! --------------------

!! Ingrian adjectives compare.

LEXICON AdvTag
ADV_ ;
LEXICON ADV_
+Adv:      K   ;


LEXICON AdvManner
+Adv+Manner:      K   ;

LEXICON AdvSpat
+Adv+Spat:      K   ;

LEXICON AdvSpat-Prl
+Adv+Spat+Prl:      K   ;

LEXICON AdvTemp
+Adv+Temp:        K   ;

LEXICON AdvTemp-Ess
+Adv+Temp+Ess:        K   ;


! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
